District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.02

Tunnel under Capitol Grounds and Botanic Garden grounds — Construction.

Subject to the approval of the Architect of the Capitol and to such conditions as he may prescribe, the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to make such use of square W-576 and reservations 12 and 6B as may be necessary for the construction of the tunnel, including borings and other preliminary work and storing of materials, and the reconstruction of that section of the Tiber Creek sewer located under square W-576 and reservation 6B.

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 334, Pub. L. 88-381, § 2
1981 Ed., § 9-136.
1973 Ed., § 9-140.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.